West Virginia, session 2025, SB301.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. Authorization for Department of Administration to promulgate legislative rules. §64-2-1. West Virginia Department of Administration. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on March 27, 2024, authorized under the authority of §5A-8-8 of this code, relating to the Department of Administration (general administration of records management and preservation, 148 CSR 12), is authorized.